Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.010

Provisions of chapter to control—Alteration by controlling instrument.

Any corporation, association, or person handling or investing trust funds as a fiduciary shall be governed in the handling and investment of such funds as in this chapter specified. A fiduciary who invests and manages trust assets owes a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with requirements of this chapter. The specific requirements of this chapter may be expanded, restricted, eliminated, or otherwise altered by provisions of the controlling instrument.

[ 1995 c 307 s 1; 1985 c 30 s 63. Prior: 1955 c 33 s 30.24.010; prior: 1947 c 100 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3255-10a. Formerly RCW 30.24.010.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 307: "This act applies prospectively only and not retroactively." [ 1995 c 307 s 7.]

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.